Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.370

Disposition of fees.

All fees collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund and used to carry out the purposes of this chapter, except as otherwise provided.

[ 2013 c 313 s 2; 2003 c 326 s 43; 1959 c 54 s 37.]

NOTES:

Fees provided in chapter 16.58 RCW to be used to carry out provisions of chapters 16.57 and 16.58 RCW: RCW 16.58.130.